Idaho, session 2026, H0687.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 92, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-9236, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-9236. UNBIASED ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN STATE GOVERNMENT. (1) As
used in this section:
(a) "Agency" means any department, office, division, board, commis-
sion, institution, or other entity of the executive branch of state gov-
ernment, including institutions of higher education.
(b) "Agency head" means the chief executive officer or governing au-
thority of an agency.
(c) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion" or "DEI" means any trainings,
programs, activities, or instruction that is derived from or that pro-
motes the tenets or concepts of critical theory, including but not lim-
ited to the concepts of unconscious or implicit bias, microaggressions,
internalized racism, cultural appropriation, structural equity, set-
tler colonialism, group marginalization, systemic oppression, social
justice, institutional or systemic racism, white fragility, racial
privilege, disparate impact, intersectionality, sexual privilege,
patriarchy, gender theory, queer theory, neopronouns, transgender
ideology, misgendering, othering, deadnaming, heteronormativity,
allyship, or any other related formulation of these tenets or concepts.
(d) "Ideological agenda" means the intentional alteration, suppres-
sion, prioritization, or framing of information or representation in
an artificial intelligence system's outputs to promote a political, so-
cial, or policy outcome, including DEI concepts, when such alteration
is not expressly requested by the user.
(e) "Large language model" means a generative artificial intelligence
system trained on large datasets that is capable of producing natural
language text, images, or other content in response to user prompts.
(2) An agency shall procure, deploy, or use a large language model only
if the model is developed and implemented in accordance with the following
principles:


(a) Truth-seeking: A large language model shall prioritize factual ac-
curacy, historical fidelity, scientific inquiry, and objectivity when
responding to prompts seeking information or analysis. Where reliable
information is incomplete, disputed, or unavailable, the model shall
acknowledge such uncertainty; and
(b) Ideological neutrality: A large language model shall function as
a neutral, nonpartisan tool and shall not intentionally manipulate out-
puts to advance or suppress an ideological agenda, including DEI con-
cepts. Ideological, normative, or policy-based responses may be gener-
ated only when expressly requested by the user or when clearly disclosed
and readily accessible to the user.
(3)(a) No agency shall procure, deploy, or use a large language model
that is designed, trained, fine-tuned, or configured to:
(i) Alter factual information or historical representation for
the purpose of achieving outcomes associated with DEI;
(ii) Suppress, refuse, or condition the generation of lawful con-
tent based on the race or sex of individuals or groups;
(iii) Embed DEI-based constraints, guardrails, or response poli-
cies that override accuracy or objectivity; or
(iv) Require users to adopt, affirm, or comply with DEI concepts
as a condition of receiving information.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a large language model
from accurately describing DEI concepts, history, or critiques in an
informational, academic, or analytical context when such information
is requested by the user.
(4)(a) Any contract entered into by an agency for the procurement or use
of a large language model shall require compliance with this paragraph.
(i) A contract shall require the vendor to provide the agency with
reasonable access, subject to confidentiality and nondisclosure
protections, to materials necessary to verify compliance with
this section, including but not limited to:
1. System prompts and content policies;
2. Model specifications and training directives;
3. Evaluation methodologies and testing results; and
4. Source code, configuration files, or other backend tech-
nical materials, if necessary to assess intentional ideo-
logical manipulation.
(ii) A contract shall provide that, upon a finding of material
noncompliance following notice and a reasonable opportunity to
cure, the agency may terminate the contract and require the vendor
to bear reasonable decommissioning or transition costs.
(b) Agencies may utilize state personnel or independent technical ex-
perts to conduct compliance reviews.
(5) Each agency shall adopt procedures to ensure compliance with this
section, including periodic review of large language model performance. In
evaluating compliance, agencies shall consider:
(a) Whether distortions or biases are systemic or intentional rather
than incidental errors;
(b) The intended use and operational context of the model; and
(c) The technical feasibility of corrective action.


(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Regulate private speech or restrict the development or sale of ar-
tificial intelligence systems outside state government;
(b) Mandate ideological viewpoints or prohibit lawful academic in-
quiry; or
(c) Create a private right of action.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.